Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-701. Voluntary retirement.

Except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, an active member who either attains sixty (60) years of age and has five (5) or more years of actual and reciprocal service or who has twenty-eight (28) or more years of credited service regardless of age may voluntarily retire upon written application filed with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If a member fails to submit a complete retirement application within six (6) calendar months after the effective date of benefits, including all additional documentation required by the system, the application shall be void unless an extension has been granted by the system.

A member shall meet the termination of covered employment requirements under § 24-7-502 to be eligible for retirement unless the member has attained normal retirement age.

A member who fails to meet the termination of employment requirements of this subsection shall have his or her retirement benefits cancelled and forfeits any retirement benefits until the termination requirements are met.

A member who fails to meet the termination requirements of this section and has received retirement benefits from the system shall repay the benefits to the system before becoming eligible again for voluntary retirement.

The system may adjust and collect any benefits that have been overpaid to a member under § 24-7-205.

A member who fails to meet the termination requirements of this section upon employment by a covered employer shall return to active member status under § 24-7-502.

Upon a member's retirement, he or she or she shall receive a life annuity as provided for in § 24-7-705.

The annuity shall begin the first day of the calendar month next following the latest of:

One (1) month after the date the written application is filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

The member's termination of active membership;

The member's attainment of the minimum age; or

The member's completion of the minimum years of credited service.

If a member has accrued a full year of service credit for a fiscal year, the annuity shall not begin earlier than on the July 1 after the fiscal year.

A member may cancel an application for voluntary retirement benefits up to two (2) calendar months after the effective date of benefits.

The member shall notify the system of cancellation in writing. Upon cancellation, the member shall be eligible for active membership in the system.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1979, No. 681, § 5; 1983, No. 17, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1993, No. 1091, § 2; 1995, No. 282, § 1; 1997, No. 992, § 1; 1997, No. 1053, § 5; 2001, No. 461, § 2; 2007, No. 97, § 10; 2009, No. 468, § 15; 2009, No. 743, §
2; 2011, No. 45, §§ 5, 6; 2013, No. 720, § 1; 2019, No. 595, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 468, in (a), deleted “Board of Trustees of the” preceding “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” in (a)(1), and inserted (a)(2)(D) and (a)(2)(E); substituted “a life annuity” for “an annuity” in (b); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 743 substituted “sixty (60) years of age” for “age sixty (60)” in (a)(1); substituted “meet the termination of covered employment requirements under § 24-7-502” for “terminate covered employment” in (a)(2)(A); deleted former (a)(2)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly.

The 2011 amendment added (a)(1)(B) and (f).

The 2013 amendment substituted “may receive service credit for the current year and use the salary for the current year in the calculation of the member's final average salary with the following restrictions” for “the following limitations shall apply” in (d); deleted former (d)(1); redesignated former (d)(3) as present (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (d); deleted former (e); and redesignated former (f) as (e).

24-7-702. Early voluntary retirement.

Except as provided under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, an active or inactive member who has a combined total of twenty-five (25) or more years of actual and reciprocal service, including purchased or free credited service, but has not attained sixty (60) years of age and is not eligible for retirement under § 24-7-701 may voluntarily retire early by filing a written application with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If a member fails to submit a complete retirement application within six (6) calendar months of the effective date of benefits, including all additional documentation required by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the application shall be void unless an extension is granted by the system.

A member shall meet the termination of covered employment requirements under § 24-7-502 to be eligible for retirement except if the member has attained normal retirement age.

A member who fails to meet the termination of covered employment requirements under this subsection shall have his or her retirement benefits cancelled and forfeits any retirement benefits until the termination requirements are met.

A member who fails to meet the termination requirements of this section and has received retirement benefits from the system shall repay the benefits to the system before becoming eligible again for voluntary retirement.

The system may adjust and collect any benefits that have been overpaid to a member under § 24-7-205.

A member who fails to meet the termination requirements of this section upon employment by a covered employer shall return to active member status under § 24-7-502.

Upon an active or inactive member's retirement as provided in this section, the member shall receive, in lieu of any other system benefit, an early annuity that shall be a certain percent of an annuity provided for in § 24-7-705.

The percent shall be one hundred percent (100%) reduced by five-twelfths percent (5/12%) multiplied by the number of months by which the time of early retirement precedes the earlier of either completion of twenty-eight (28) years of credited service or attainment of sixty (60) years of age.

The board may set by board resolution the early annuity reduction under subdivision (b)(1) of this section at a percentage rate between five percent (5%) per year and fifteen percent (15%) per year, to be prorated monthly, if the:

System's actuary certifies to the board that the amortization period to pay the unfunded liabilities of the system exceeds eighteen (18) years; and

Board determines that a reduction in the cost of early voluntary retirement is prudent to maintain actuarial soundness.

Effective July 1, 1997, the annuities of those members who chose early retirement when the years of service required for an unreduced annuity was thirty-five (35) or more years shall be adjusted to reflect the amount for which they would have been entitled had the number of years to retire with an unreduced annuity been thirty (30) years on the effective date of their retirement.

The annuities of those members who chose early retirement from July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1999, who received an early annuity as provided in § 24-7-702 that was in effect at the time of their retirement, shall be adjusted effective July 1, 1999, to reflect a percent of the annuity as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section.

Effective July 1, 2001, the annuities of those members who chose early retirement when the years of service required for an unreduced annuity was thirty (30) or more years shall be adjusted to reflect the amount for which they would have been entitled had the number of years to retire with an unreduced annuity been twenty-eight (28) years on the effective date of their retirement, and the annuities of those members shall be adjusted effective July 1, 2001, to reflect a percent of the annuity as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, which was in effect July 1, 1999.

The adjustments described in subdivision (b)(3) of this section shall not be retroactive to the effective date of the member's retirement.

For an active member, the annuity shall begin the first day of the calendar month next following the latest of:

One (1) month after the date the written application is filed with the board;

The member's termination of active membership; or

The member's completion of the required credited service.

For an inactive member, the annuity shall begin the first day of the calendar month after the date his or her written application is received by the board.

If a member has accrued a full year of service credit for a fiscal year, the annuity shall not begin earlier than on the July 1 after the fiscal year.

A member may cancel an application for early voluntary retirement benefits up to two (2) calendar months after the effective date of benefits.

The member shall notify the system of cancellation in writing. Upon cancellation, the member shall be eligible for active membership in the system.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, § 9; 1981, No. 365, § 6; 1983, No. 17, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1993, No. 1091, § 3; 1995, No. 282, § 2; 1997, No. 992, § 2; 1997, No. 1074, § 1; 1999, No. 1521, § 1; 2001, No. 461, § 3; 2001, No. 1300, § 1; 2005, No. 385, § 5; 2007, No. 97, § 11; 2009, No. 468, § 16; 2009, No. 743, §
3; 2011, No. 45, §§ 7, 8; 2013, No. 720, § 2; 2017, No. 293, §
3; 2017, No. 750, § 1; 2019, No. 595, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 468, in (a), substituted “meet the termination of covered employment
requirements under § 24-7-502” for “terminate covered employment” in (a)(2)(A), deleted (a)(2)(B) and redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly, substituted “under subsection (a) of this section” for “of this subsection” in (a)(2)(B), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 743, in (a), made a stylistic change in (a)(1), substituted “meet the termination of covered employment
requirements under § 24-7-502” for “terminate covered employment” in (a)(2)(A), deleted (a)(2)(B), and redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly.

The 2011 amendment added (a)(1)(B) and (g).

The 2013 amendment substituted “may receive service credit for the current year and use the salary for the current year in the calculation of the member's final average salary with the following restrictions” for “the following limitations shall apply” in (e); deleted former (e)(1); redesignated former (e)(2) and (3) as present (e)(1) and (2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 293 rewrote (a)(1)(A).

The 2017 amendment by No. 750 added (b)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (e); deleted former (f); and redesignated former (g) as (f).

24-7-703. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the ending of accruals at age 72, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 652, § 11. The former section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, §§ 6-13; 1977, No. 541, §§ 5-8; 1977, No. 640, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 727, § 1; 1979, No. 681, §§ 5-12; 1979, No. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 14, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 6, 7; 1981, No. 435, § 2; 1983, No. 17, § 2; 1983, No. 127, § 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 9-11; 1983, No. 665, §§ 9-11; 1985, No. 805, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443.

24-7-704. Disability retirement.

An active member in employer service with five (5) or more years of actual and reciprocal service who becomes totally and permanently physically or mentally incapacitated for his or her job duties as a result of a personal injury or disease may be retired by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System upon a determination of disability consistent with this section and approval of a written application filed with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

An active member who is eligible for retirement under § 24-7-701 is not eligible for disability retirement.

An active member who has met the eligibility requirement of subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall meet the termination of covered employment requirements under § 24-7-502 to be eligible for disability retirement benefits.

For eligibility under this section, a member is considered active for an additional fiscal year following the last fiscal year that the member renders actual service to a covered employer and obtains at least one-fourth (¼) year of service credit.

Service credit used in calculating any benefits paid under this section means days of service, including paid sick leave covered by the employer.

The member is qualified to receive disability retirement benefits if by majority opinion the medical committee reports to the board in writing that its review of the member's application and accompanying documentation finds:

The member is physically or mentally incapacitated;

The member exhibits symptoms of physical or mental incapacitation while the member is employed by a system employer as an active member;

The member is unable to perform his or her current work duties;

The incapacity will most likely be permanent; and

The member should be retired.

The disability retirement is effective from the date the written application is filed with the system and the member is no longer employed by an employer.

A member shall submit a complete disability application with the supporting documentation required by the system application within six (6) calendar months of the effective date of benefits.

An application is void when a complete application and supporting documentation are not submitted to the system within six (6) calendar months of the effective date of benefits, unless an extension has been granted by the system.

To begin receiving disability retirement, a member shall not:

Be employed by a system-covered employer; or

Be indirectly employed by or through an independent contractor, limited liability company, partnership, corporation, or legal entity that is employed by a system-covered employer if the member has substantial control of the employer-employee relationship, including without limitation the ability to negotiate rates of pay with the system-covered employer or assign work and work hours to the member.

Upon disability retirement as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a retirant shall receive an annuity provided for in § 24-7-705 and shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-7-706.

In addition to the requirements of this subsection, the member's disability retirement is subject to the provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

A member or retirant may continue to receive a disability retirement benefit under this section when the member or retirant provides the system with a Social Security Administration determination letter finding the member or retirant is disabled within thirty-six (36) months from:

July 1, 2015, when the member's or retirant's disability retirement effective date is before July 1, 2015; or

The effective date of disability retirement when the member's or retirant's disability retirement effective date is on or after July 1, 2015.

The member or retirant may apply for an extension of the thirty-six-month deadline when:

The member or retirant can demonstrate through an administrative or judicial confirmation of an active Social Security Administration disability claim that the claim is still under review and is a part of a continuous claim without voluntary dismissal or withdrawal; and

The Social Security Administration disability claim was filed and remained active for at least twenty-four (24) months prior to the thirty-six-month deadline under subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section.

The system shall terminate disability retirement benefits to a member or retirant when the member or retirant fails to:

Provide a Social Security Administration determination letter finding that the member or retirant is disabled to the system within the thirty-six-month period under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section;

Receive an extension of time under subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section to provide the system with a letter from the Social Security Administration finding that the member or retirant is disabled; or

Apply for a review by the system's medical committee within three (3) months of disability benefits ceasing due to the lack of a Social Security Administration determination letter finding that the member or retirant is disabled.

A member or retirant who seeks and fails to receive a determination letter finding the member or retirant disabled by the Social Security Administration may seek a review permitted under subdivision (b)(3)(C)(iii) of this section no earlier than three (3) months before the date on which the member's disability retirement would otherwise end and no later than three (3) months after termination of disability retirement.

The system's medical committee shall hear all applications for review permitted under subdivision (b)(3)(C)(iii) of this section and render decisions consistent with the definition of disability under subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section.

The medical committee's recommendation after its review of an application permitted under subdivision (b)(3)(C)(iii) of this section shall be presented to the board for a final order.

After receiving the medical committee's recommendation under subdivision (b)(3)(D)(iii) of this section, the board shall issue a final order consistent with the provisions of this chapter and the system's rules for initial disability retirement.

The board's approval of the medical committee's recommendation shall be a final disposition of the matter by the system under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

[Repealed.]

If a disability retiree returns to covered employment before attaining sixty (60) years of age, his or her disability retirement shall terminate unless the retiree meets the requirements to return to covered employment under subsection (e) of this section.

If a disability retirant returns to covered employment after attaining sixty (60) years of age and is otherwise eligible for retirement under § 24-7-707, the retirant shall be treated as if he or she retired under § 24-7-701.

If a disability retirant under sixty (60) years of age returns to covered employment, he or she shall become an active member of the system immediately, and his or her credited service at the time of his or her disability retirement shall be restored to his or her credit in the members' deposit account.

The retirant's disability retirement and his or her accumulated contributions shall be treated as if he or she returned to service on the date of the full-time employment.

Except as provided under subdivision (c)(2) of this section, a disability retirant shall not earn or be given service credit for the period he or she was receiving a disability retirement annuity.

A member has six (6) calendar months from the date of application for disability retirement to submit a completed application and accompanying documentation.

If a member does not provide all the accompanying documentation requested by the system within the six (6) calendar months, the system will submit the application to the medical committee for review as complete or withdraw the application at the request of the member unless an extension is granted by the system.

A disability retiree may be employed by a covered employer and also receive a monthly disability retirement if the disability retiree provides the covered employer with less than eighty (80) days of actual service during a fiscal year.

A disability retiree who meets the requirements of this subsection shall continue to receive his or her monthly disability retirement annuity from the system and shall not accrue additional service credit.

A covered employer who employs a disability retiree under this subsection shall remit contributions on all salary paid to the disability retiree in an amount equal to the employer contribution rate applicable to an active member.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1977, No. 541, § 7; 1979, No. 681, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 6; 2001, No. 461, § 4; 2005, No. 385, § 6; 2007, No. 487, § 1; 2009, No. 468, § 17; 2009 No. 743, §§ 4, 5; 2011, No. 45, § 9; 2011, No. 137, § 1; 2011, No. 973, § 1; 2013, No. 493, § 1; 2015, No. 219, § 1; 2017, No. 549, §§ 1-7; 2019, No. 209, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 468, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “an active member” for “any member,” inserted “approval of a,” and substituted “Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “board by or on behalf of the member,” substituted “a review of the member's application and accompanying documentation is conducted by” for “after a medical examination of the member made by or under the direction of” in (a)(1)(C), and rewrote (a)(2); substituted “covered employment” for “full-time service as defined by rules promulgated by the board” in (c)(5)(A) and (c)(5)(B); inserted “and is otherwise eligible for retirement under § 24-7-707” in (c)(5)(B); substituted “covered employment” for “full-time service” in (c)(6)(A);
and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 743, in (a)(1)(B), deleted (a)(1)(B)(ii), redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly, and substituted “meet the termination of covered employment requirements under § 24-7-502” for
“terminate covered employment”; and deleted “and is subject to the limitations applicable to age and service
retirants” at the end of (c)(5)(B).

The 2011 amendment by No. 45 added (d).

The 2011 amendment by No. 137 added (a)(1)(B)(ii) and (iii).

The 2011 amendment by No. 973 rewrote the introductory paragraph of (a)(1)(C); and inserted (a)(1)(C)(ii) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “An” for “Except as provided under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, an,” deleted “and reciprocal” following “actual,” and inserted “a determination of disability consistent with this section and”; inserted present (a)(1)(B), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “from the date the written application … no longer employed by an employer” for “the calendar month following the member's termination of active membership” in (a)(2); and added (a)(3).

The 2015 amendment inserted present (a)(3) and redesignated former (a)(3) as (a)(4); redesignated (b) as (b)(1) and (2); substituted “retirant” for “member” in (b)(1); in (b)(2), substituted “In addition to the requirements of this subsection, the member’s” for “His or her,” substituted “is” for “shall be,” and deleted “and to the provisions of § 24-7-708” at the end; added (b)(3) and (4); in (c)(4), substituted “If the medical committee, upon the medical examination of the retirant, or the system staff on behalf of the medical committee” for “If upon the medical examination of the retirant the medical committee” and inserted “with cause”; and inserted “earn or” in (c)(7).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1)(A), inserted “and reciprocal” and substituted “duties as a result” for “duties as the result”; substituted “begin receiving” for “receive” in (a)(4); substituted “shall” for “will” in the introductory language of (b)(3)(C); added (b)(3)(C)(iii); added (b)(3)(D); repealed (b)(4); rewrote (c); added new (e); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, in (c)(1)(A), substituted “retiree” for “retirant” twice, and deleted “or obtains a waiver” following “covered employment”; and rewrote (e).

24-7-705. Life annuity.

For a member who is retired or who is in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan as of June 30, 2013, the multipliers used at the time of retirement or entry into the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall remain the multipliers used to calculate the member's retirement benefits for retirement or the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan.

For all service earned through June 30, 2013, by a member who is active or inactive on June 30, 2013, he or she shall receive a straight life annuity equal to his or her number of years of credited service for which member contributions were made as provided in § 24-7-406 multiplied by two and fifteen-hundredths percent (2.15%) of his or her final average salary, or a straight life annuity equal to his or her number of years of credited service rendered after June 30, 1986, for which no member contributions were made as provided in § 24-7-406 multiplied by one and thirty-nine hundredths percent (1.39%) of his or her final average salary, or a combination of both.

The multipliers in this section shall be determined in accordance with this chapter and the rules and resolutions of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as is actuarially appropriate for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Before increasing a benefit as provided in this section, the board shall file relevant information concerning the actuarial appropriateness of the action with the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs.

For a member contributing on only the first seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800) of each annual salary after June 30, 1969, each annual salary used in computing his or her final average salary shall be limited to a maximum of seven thousand eight hundred dollars ($7,800).

The limit shall apply to his or her total credited service.

For a member retiring with benefits to be computed on both contributory and noncontributory service under this subsection and free military service first credited after July 1, 1986, under § 24-7-602, the amount of military service to be used in the computation of benefits under this subsection shall be prorated on the ratio of membership service under each plan to his or her total membership service, notwithstanding the fact that some of the military service shall be credited as noncontributory service before July 1, 1986.

All purchased military service, all out-of-state service credited under § 24-7-603, and all overseas service credited under § 24-7-604 shall be counted as contributory service, and benefits based on this service shall be computed using the contributory percent of final average salary set forth in this subsection.

The multiplier on service credit earned shall remain two and fifteen hundredths percent (2.15%) for contributory service and one and thirty-nine hundredths percent (1.39%) for noncontributory service unless the rates are adjusted by the board.

The board may adjust the multiplier for contributory service rendered after June 30, 2013, as follows:

The multiplier rate for contributory service set by the board shall remain in effect unless adjusted by the board;

The multiplier rate for contributory service shall not be less than one and seventy-five hundredths percent (1.75%) or higher than two and fifteen hundredths percent (2.15%);

An increase or decrease to a multiplier rate for contributory service shall apply to a complete fiscal year;

The multiplier rate for contributory service may be adjusted by resolution adopted by the board at a board meeting;

Once a multiplier rate for contributory service is earned in a fiscal year, the multiplier rate may be subject to an increase but not a decrease if adopted by the board;

The board may leave the multiplier rate for contributory service earned in previous years in effect even if the multiplier rate for contributory service is increased for future years;

The board may set a special contributory multiplier rate for the first ten (10) years of service credit as follows:

The multiplier rate for contributory service shall not be less than one and seventy-five hundredths percent (1.75%) or higher than two and fifteen hundredths percent (2.15%);

The multiplier rate for contributory service used for the first ten (10) years of service shall not be higher than the multiplier rate for subsequent years of service; and

After a member earns ten (10) years of credited service, the board may increase the multiplier rate earned in the first ten (10) years to the standard multiplier rate for contributory service for all or part of the first ten (10) years of service.

The board may adjust the multiplier rate for noncontributory service for all service rendered after June 30, 2013, as follows:

The multiplier rate for noncontributory service set by the board shall remain in effect unless adjusted by the board;

The multiplier rate for noncontributory service shall not be less than five-tenths of one percent (0.5%) or higher than one and thirty-nine hundredths percent (1.39%);

An increase or decrease to a multiplier rate for noncontributory service shall apply to a complete fiscal year;

The multiplier rate for noncontributory service may be adjusted by resolution adopted by the board at a board meeting;

Once a multiplier rate for noncontributory service is earned in a fiscal year, the multiplier rate may be subject to an increase but not a decrease if adopted by the board;

The board may leave the multiplier rate for noncontributory service earned in previous years in effect even if the multiplier rate for noncontributory service is increased for future years;

The board may set a special noncontributory multiplier rate for the first ten (10) years of service credit as follows:

The multiplier rate for noncontributory service used for the first ten (10) years of service shall not be higher than the multiplier rate for subsequent years of service; and

After a member earns ten (10) years of credited service, the board may increase the multiplier rate earned in the first ten (10) years to the standard multiplier rate for noncontributory service for all or part of the first ten (10) years of service.

A lower multiplier rate set by the board for contributory service and noncontributory service earned in the first ten (10) years of service shall not be retroactively applied.

The board shall not reduce the multiplier rate for contributory service earned after the first ten (10) years of service unless the:

System's actuary certifies to the board that the amortization period to pay the unfunded liabilities of the system exceeds eighteen (18) years; and

Board determines that a reduction in the multiplier rate for contributory service is prudent to maintain actuarial soundness.

For all service credit earned by a member after June 30, 2013, he or she shall receive a straight life annuity equal to his or her number of years of credited service multiplied by his or her final average salary as follows:

Credited service for which member contributions were made under § 24-7-406 shall be multiplied by the contributory multiplier in effect for each fiscal year;

Credited service rendered after June 30, 1986, for which no member contributions were made under § 24-7-406 shall be multiplied by the noncontributory multiplier in effect for each fiscal year; and

If the member has accrued both contributory service and noncontributory service, the member's service shall be combined after calculating each amount under this subsection.

Upon a member's retirement, as provided in this act, he or she shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-7-706.

A member retiring before July 1, 1987, shall receive an annuity in accordance with provisions of law in force before July 1, 1987.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, §§ 6-13; 1977, No. 541, §§ 5-8; 1977, No. 640, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 727, § 1; 1979, No. 681, §§ 5-12; 1979, No. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 14, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 6, 7; 1981, No. 435, § 2; 1983, No. 17, § 2; 1983, No. 127, § 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 9-11; 1983, No. 665, §§ 9-11; 1985, No. 504, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1987, No. 802, § 1; 1989, No. 652, § 9; 1991, No. 44, §§ 1, 2; 1993, No. 435, § 7; 1995, No. 542, § 6; 1997, No. 992, § 3; 1997, No. 1053, § 7; 1999, No. 221, § 1; 1999, No. 396, § 1; 2003, No. 853, § 1; 2013, No. 966, § 1; 2017, No. 293, §
4; 2017, No. 551, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in present (a)(1)(A)(ii), substituted “For all service earned . . . inactive on June 30, 2013” for “After July 1, 1999, upon a member's retirement” and deleted “not less than two and sixty-five thousandths percent (2.065%) nor more than” following “multiplied by” in two places; deleted “subdivision (a)(1)(A) of” preceding “this section” in present (a)(1)(B)(i); inserted (a)(1)(A)(i) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; rewrote (b); and added present (c).

The 2017 amendment by No. 293, in (a)(1)(B)(i), substituted “multipliers” for “percentages” and substituted “this chapter and the rules and resolutions” for “rules, and regulations”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 551 rewrote (b)(5).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1973, No. 427, codified as §§ 24-7-201 — 24-7-205, 24-7-301 — 24-7-305, 24-7-401 — 24-7-411, 24-7-501, 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-604, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, 24-7-716.